Hawaii statutes.
§46-11 Federal flood insurance. The
Hawaii tourism authority in regard to the convention center district and the
mayor or executive officer and the council of the various counties, in regard
to the respective counties, may participate and apply on behalf of their
respective district and counties for flood insurance coverage pursuant to any
applicable provisions of Public Law 1016, Eighty-fourth Congress, Second
Session, (70 Stat. 1078). The Hawaii tourism authority, in regard to the
convention center district, and the mayor or executive officer and the council
of the various counties, in regard to the respective counties, shall be vested
with the functions, powers, and duties which are necessary to enable their
respective district and counties to qualify, participate, and apply for the
flood insurance coverage. [L 1957, c 178, §3; Supp, §138-43; HRS §46-11; am L
Sp 1993, c 7, §3; am L 2003, c 3, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next